Kentucky statutes. TITLE VII Public Property and Public Printing
Energy Efficiency for State Government Buildings

56.770.
Definitions for KRS 56.770 to 56.784.

As used in KRS

56.770

to

56.784

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Aggregate simple payback period” means the simple payback period of a set of energy conservation measures taken together for a building;

“Building” means all contiguous land, structures, appurtenances, and improvements that use utilities;

“Cabinet” means the Finance and Administration Cabinet;

“Energy audit” means examination of a building’s utility-using systems, utilities consumption and costs, occupancy patterns, and operation and maintenance procedures;

“Energy conservation measure” means any construction, process, improvement, repair, alteration, or betterment of a building or other state property that is intended to reduce utility consumption or operational cost; or any equipment, fixture, or furnishing to be added to or used in a building that will be a cost-effective utility-related project that is intended to reduce utility consumption or operational costs;

“Guaranteed energy savings performance contract” means an agreement for the provision of energy services or equipment, energy conservation measures and alternate energy technologies for state government buildings or other state property, in which a person agrees to design, construct, install, maintain, operate, or manage energy systems or equipment to improve energy efficiency of, or produce energy in connection with, a state government building. Payments for a guaranteed energy savings performance contract shall be made from measured and verified savings generated from implementation of the energy conservation measures financed by the contract. The term of a guaranteed energy savings performance contract shall not exceed the life of the energy savings generated from implementation of the energy conservation measures financed by the contract. If the measured and verified savings are not sufficient to pay the financial obligations under the contract, the contractor is liable for the contract payments;

“High-performance building” means a public building that is designed, constructed, and capable of being operated in a manner that:

Increases environmental performance and economic value over time;

Safeguards the health of occupants;

Enhances satisfaction and productivity of workers through energy-efficient systems;

Incorporates environmentally friendly materials and products; and

Reduces waste;

“High-performance building standards” means a set of standards developed by the cabinet pursuant to KRS

56.777

;

“Engineering analysis” means a detailed cost-benefit analysis of energy efficiency investments including a review of potential cost savings through operation and maintenance changes;

“Life-cycle cost analysis” means a method for estimating the total cost of an energy-using component or building over its useful life, including cost factors such as purchase price or construction, renovation, or leasing costs, energy use, maintenance, interest, and inflation;

“Low cost/no cost energy conservation measures” means those energy saving practices and energy conservation measures, usually involving operation and maintenance practices, that can be accomplished by existing personnel within existing operating budgets;

“Simple payback period” means the number of years it takes to pay back, from estimated savings, the initial cost of an energy conservation measure with the simple payback period equal to the initial cost divided by the estimated annual savings;

“Savings” means the reduction in expenditures, excluding any state government and post-secondary education personnel expenditures, that are measured and verified, including but not limited to energy usage, operating costs, and capital cost avoidance that occur as a result of the implementation of energy conservation measures;

“Capital cost avoidance” means savings generated when expenditures of appropriated capital construction or appropriated capital outlay funds are avoided because the budgeted capital improvements or items of equipment are contained within the energy conservation measures provided by a guaranteed energy savings performance contract;

“Operating costs” means expenditures associated with operating and maintaining a properly functioning building and its systems including but not limited to the heating, ventilation, cooling, lighting, plumbing, water heating, electrical, and laundry systems and their controls;

“Public building” has the same meaning as in KRS

318.010

;

“ENERGY STAR” means the voluntary program administered by the United States Environmental Protection Agency and the United States Department of Energy that is designed to protect the environment through the promotion of energy-efficient products and practices;

“Green Globes rating system” means the on-line environmental assessment tool developed by the Green Building Initiative as of December, 2004, that allows designers, property owners, and managers to evaluate and rate buildings against best sustainable building design practices and integrate principles of sustainable architecture at every stage of project delivery in order to design and construct buildings that will be energy-efficient and resource-efficient, achieve operational savings, and provide healthier environments in which to live and work; and

“LEED” means the building rating systems developed on or after January 1, 2005, by the United States Green Building Council that allow designers, property owners, and managers to evaluate and rate buildings against best sustainable building design and practices and to integrate principles of sustainable architecture at every stage of project delivery in order to design and construct buildings that will be energy-efficient and resource-efficient using a whole-building approach in five (5) key areas of human and environmental health:

Sustainable site development;

Water savings;

Energy efficiency;

Material selection; and

Environmental quality.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 223, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 35, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2007 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 29, effective August 30, 2007; 2008, ch. 139, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; repeal and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 5, §
1, effective February 25, 2010; 2014, ch. 65, § 1, effective July 15, 2014.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(2/25/2010). 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 5, sec. 28, provides that the repeal and reenactment of this section in that Act “shall apply retroactively to July 15, 2008.”

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 11, (4) at 1699.

56.772.
Legislative intent — Energy Efficiency Program for State Government Buildings.

The General Assembly finds and declares it to be the public policy of the Commonwealth to maximize the use of energy conservation measures in the construction, renovation, and maintenance of buildings owned or leased by the Commonwealth. In furtherance of this policy, the cabinet shall administer an energy efficiency program, to be known as the Energy Efficiency Program for State Government Buildings.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 223, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 2008, ch. 139, § 2, effective July 15, 2008; repeal and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 5, §
2, effective February 25, 2010; 2014, ch. 65, § 2, effective July 15, 2014.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(2/25/2010). 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 5, sec. 28, provides that the repeal and reenactment of this section in that Act “shall apply retroactively to July 15, 2008.”

56.774.
Purpose of program — Engineering analysis — Methods of finance — Documentation of savings.

The Energy Efficiency Program for State Government Buildings shall provide for implementation of low cost/no cost energy conservation measures, engineering analyses, energy efficiency measures, building improvements, and monitoring of results for state-owned or state-leased buildings.

Any engineering analysis conducted on a state-owned building shall assess the energy efficiency of the building and make recommendations for improving the efficient use of energy within the building. The analyses shall be performed by qualified engineers, architects, or other persons trained in energy efficiency who may be employees of the cabinet or employed pursuant to KRS Chapter 45A, except that any engineers, architects or other persons trained in energy efficiency and retained under a guaranteed energy savings performance contract, shall not be subject to the provisions of KRS

45A.800

to

45A.835

.

Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, measures to improve the energy efficiency of a state-owned building, which have an aggregate simple payback period of five (5) years or less, shall be implemented as general fund appropriations become available. No more than five percent (5%) of the cost of energy conservation measures for a building may be utilized for monitoring the results.

If general fund appropriations are available for energy conservation improvements, the cabinet shall prioritize projects among the various state-owned buildings to determine which projects shall be implemented to best utilize the available funding.

If general fund appropriations are unavailable, energy conservation measures for a state-owned building may be financed by other means. These other means include but are not limited to guaranteed energy savings performance contracts as defined under KRS

56.770

entered into pursuant to KRS

45A.085

and KRS 45A.045(10). Guaranteed energy savings performance contracts shall not be subject to the provisions of KRS

45A.800

to

45A.835

. These energy conservation measures shall not be limited to those that have an aggregate simple payback period of five (5) years or less, but shall result in reasonable economic benefit to the Commonwealth. Ownership of the energy conservation measures shall be transferred to the Commonwealth upon completion of the guaranteed energy savings performance contract or as otherwise agreed upon in the contract. Savings from the implementation of the energy conservation measures under the guaranteed energy savings performance contract shall be used to satisfy the obligations under the guaranteed energy savings performance contract and to repay the cost of the other means used to finance the energy conservation measures, and may be used to repay expenses incurred by the cabinet to reimburse the cabinet for expenses related to the guaranteed energy savings performance contract, including but not limited to staff time for monitoring, overseeing, and managing the project. Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, remaining savings shall remain in the state agency account and shall not lapse. All savings projected under a guaranteed energy savings performance contract shall be guaranteed to the Commonwealth.

The savings in reduced expenditures that are specified as payment sources shall be documented in the guaranteed energy savings performance contract. Savings shall be determined by using one (1) of the measurement and verification methodologies listed in the United States Department of Energy’s “International Performance Measurement and Verification Protocol.” If specific data limitations or documented unique characteristics of the project prevent use of the “International Performance Measurement and Verification Protocol,” an alternative method that is compatible shall be adopted upon documentation and approval of the secretary of the cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 223, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 375, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 35, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2008, ch. 139, § 3, effective July 15, 2008; repeal and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 5, §
3, effective February 25, 2010; 2014, ch. 65, § 3, effective July 15, 2014.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(2/25/2010). 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 5, sec. 28, provides that the repeal and reenactment of this section in that Act “shall apply retroactively to July 15, 2008.”

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 11, (4) at 1699.

56.775.
Required high-performance building standards — Use of energy-efficiency products.

To improve energy efficiency throughout state government, the cabinet and universities that manage their own capital construction projects under KRS

164A.580

shall:

Beginning July 1, 2009, require that all construction or renovation of public buildings for which fifty percent (50%) or more of the total capital cost is paid by the Commonwealth shall be designed and constructed, or renovated, to meet the high-performance building standards established in KRS

56.777

. This subsection applies to all projects that have not entered the design phase prior to January 1, 2009;

Require that all building leases entered into by the Commonwealth or any of its agencies on and after July 1, 2018, shall meet the high-performance building standards. From July 15, 2008 and prior to July 1, 2018, a building that meets the high-performance building standards established in this section shall be given a preference in the state leasing process over other buildings that do not meet the high-performance building standards; and

Incorporate ENERGY STAR-qualified products in state agency procurements to the extent economically feasible using a life-cycle cost analysis.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 31, effective August 30, 2007; 2008, ch. 139, § 4, effective July 15, 2008; repeal and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 5, §
4, effective February 25, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(2/25/2010). 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 5, sec. 28, provides that the repeal and reenactment of this section in that Act “shall apply retroactively to July 15, 2008.”

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Stephens & Hinkle, Sustainable Design And Construction: Where Is It “Leeding” Us? Vol 74, No. 2, March 2010, Ky. Bench & Bar 20.

56.776.
Energy audit training program — Additional programs on energy awareness.

The cabinet, with the assistance of the Office of Energy Policy, shall institute an energy audit training program to identify energy saving techniques for state-owned building maintenance staff. Additional programs shall be developed to educate state employees and other building occupants on energy awareness and practices to reduce energy use in state-owned buildings. Local government employees may be included in training and educational programs.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 223, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 2005, ch. 95, § 53, effective June 20, 2005; 2007 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 30, effective August 30, 2007; 2008, ch. 139, § 6, effective July 15, 2008; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 5, § 6, effective February 25, 2010; 2010, ch. 24, § 54, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 29, § 2, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(2/25/2010). 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 5, sec. 28, provides that the repeal and reenactment of this section in that Act “shall apply retroactively to July 15, 2008.”

56.777.
High-Performance Buildings Advisory Committee — Membership — Duties — Administrative regulations — Resource utilization.

A High-Performance Buildings Advisory Committee is hereby created and shall be administratively staffed by the cabinet.

The committee shall consist of sixteen (16) members and shall include:

A representative of the cabinet designated by the secretary;

A representative of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet designated by the secretary;

A representative of the Department of Education designated by the commissioner;

A representative of the Council on Postsecondary Education designated by the president;

A representative of the Office of Energy Policy designated by the executive director; and

A representative appointed by the Governor from each of the following:

The design and construction industry involved in public works contracting;

The Kentucky Chapter of the U. S. Green Building Council;

The University of Kentucky College of Design;

The Kentucky Forest Industries Association;

The Kentucky Society of the American Institute of Architects;

The American Society of Heating, Refrigerating, and Air-Conditioning Engineers;

The Associated General Contractors of Kentucky;

The West Kentucky Construction Association;

The Kentucky Manufactured Housing Institute;

The Kentucky Ready Mixed Concrete Association; and

The Plantmix Asphalt Industry of Kentucky.

The representative of the cabinet shall serve as the chairperson of the committee. All appointments shall be for a term of two (2) years. Committee members shall serve until their successors are appointed and shall be eligible for reappointment.

The committee shall meet at least monthly or as convened by the chairperson.

The members of the committee shall receive reimbursement for the cost of travel to and from the meetings and any costs necessarily incurred in carrying out their duties.

The committee shall:

Consult with architects, engineers, builders, energy and conservation organizations, and other interested stakeholders, and make recommendations to the cabinet regarding:

Standards and benchmarks developed under existing high-performance building programs, including the ENERGY STAR rating system, Green Globes rating system, and Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design (LEED) Green Building rating system; and

Standards and guidelines developed and adopted by the U.S. Green Building Council, the American Society of Heating, Refrigerating and Air-Conditioning Engineers, and the Illuminating Engineering Society of North America partnership concerning the design of sustainable buildings to balance environmental responsibility, resource efficiency, occupant comfort and well-being, and community sensitivity;

Assist the cabinet in the review of state building projects to ensure that building performance and efficiency are maximized to the extent economically feasible using a life-cycle cost analysis;

Assist the cabinet in developing a process of documentation of the attainment of high-performance building standards; and

Assist the cabinet in conducting an ongoing professional development program for state and local building designers, construction companies, school districts, building managers, and the general public on high-performance building design, construction, maintenance, and operation.

Prior to the implementation of KRS

56.770

to

56.784

, the cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A necessary to implement this section. The cabinet shall consider the recommendations made by the High- Performance Buildings Advisory Committee pursuant to subsection (6) of this section and shall establish the criteria for the high-performance building standards and the benchmarks by which the high-performance building standards will be measured. At a minimum, the cabinet shall:

Include the standards for site selection and management, water efficiency, energy conservation, waste reduction, material and resource use, and indoor air quality; and

Require that each high-performance building be designed, constructed, or renovated so that it is capable of being rated as an ENERGY STAR building in accordance with the criteria and rating system adopted by the United States Environmental Protection Agency and in effect at the time the building is designed or, in the case of leased buildings, at the time the lease is entered into on or after July 1, 2018.

In developing the criteria for the high-performance building standards, the cabinet shall consider and encourage the use of:

Locally grown lumber from forest lands implementing sustainable practices established by the American Tree Farm System’s Sustainable Forest Initiative or the Kentucky Forest Stewardship Program established under KRS

149.330

to

149.355

;

Building materials manufactured with recycled content within the Commonwealth; and

Renewable energy sources.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 139, § 5, effective July 15, 2008; 2009, ch. 16, § 7, effective June 25, 2009; repeal and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 5, §
5, effective February 25, 2010; 2010, ch. 24, § 54, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 105, § 3, effective June 24, 2015; 2018 ch. 29, § 3, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(2/25/2010). 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 5, sec. 28, provides that the repeal and reenactment of this section in that Act “shall apply retroactively to July 15, 2008.”

56.778.
Inclusion of life-cycle energy cost analyses in bids or plans to construct or renovate state-owned buildings.

The cabinet shall require persons submitting bids or plans for state-owned buildings to be constructed or substantially renovated after July 15, 1996, to include within those bids or plans life-cycle energy cost analyses. The cabinet shall consider those life-cycle cost analyses when evaluating competing bids or plans.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 223, § 5, effective July 15, 1996; 2008, ch. 139, § 7, effective July 15, 2008; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 5, § 7, effective February 25, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(2/25/2010). 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 5, sec. 28, provides that the repeal and reenactment of this section in that Act “shall apply retroactively to July 15, 2008.”

56.780.
Evaluation for cost-effective energy use and energy efficiency of buildings prior to lease or purchase — Structure of leases.

Any building which the Finance and Administration Cabinet considers for leasing or purchase shall be evaluated for cost-effective energy use and energy efficiency. This evaluation shall be considered in choosing between competing leases or building purchases. The cabinet shall consider the energy costs of operating a building to ensure the selection of a cost-effective lease, and the cabinet shall compare life-cycle energy cost analyses for competing leases.

A lease may be structured so that both the lessor and the state agency as lessee may share energy cost savings that can be accomplished by energy-efficient lease arrangements. The lease may incorporate financial incentives to make energy efficiency improvements that are cost effective in reducing the operating cost of the building. The lease may provide for the state agency to make lease payments which may be used to help fund the costs of energy conservation measures in the building, if the costs are amortized and returned to the state agency over a period of years not to exceed the useful life of the energy conservation measures. Thereafter, the state agency shall be entitled to a reduction in the lease amount based on any continued savings resulting from the energy conservation measures. The amount of reduction shall be negotiated between the lessor and the state agency.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 223, § 6, effective July 15, 1996; 2014, ch. 65, § 4, effective July 15, 2014.

56.782.
Report on use of energy-efficiency measures in state government — Contents.

The cabinet shall report on or before October 15, 2008, and on or before every October 15 thereafter to the Legislative Research Commission on progress made to maximize the use of energy-efficiency measures in state government. The Legislative Research Commission shall transmit the report to the appropriate interim joint committees and to the General Assembly when it convenes. The report shall include but not be limited to:

A summary of initiatives undertaken by the cabinet during the reporting period to promote adoption of low cost/no cost energy-efficiency measures, including employee training efforts;

A summary of energy-efficiency measures installed and energy improvements made during the reporting period;

Energy consumption and expenditure data for facilities owned or leased by state government and any documented savings made as a result of energy-efficiency measures and improvements;

Status report on the number of buildings newly constructed, renovated, or leased in accordance with the high-performance building standards required under KRS

56.777

and the amount of savings realized based upon a life-cycle cost analysis;

Any efforts made during the reporting period to promote acquisition of energy-efficient products pursuant to KRS 45A.045(12) and the amount of savings expected to be realized in the first year of operation from the purchase of ENERGY STAR-qualified products pursuant to KRS

56.775

;

Any recommendations for future funding of energy improvements or other measures needed to assure energy efficiency in state government; and

Any improvements in energy efficiency planned or realized through the use of the LEED rating system, the Green Globes rating system, ENERGY STAR-qualified products, and guaranteed energy savings performance contracts.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 223, § 7, effective July 15, 1996; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, §§ 34, 43, effective May 30, 1997; 2007 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 33, effective August 30, 2007; 2008, ch. 139, § 8, effective July 15, 2008; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 5, § 8, effective February 25, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(2/25/2010). 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 5, sec. 28, provides that the repeal and reenactment of this section in that Act “shall apply retroactively to July 15, 2008.”

56.783.
Energy efficiency in state government buildings revolving loan fund.

A special fund in the State Treasury is hereby created which shall be known as the energy efficiency in state government buildings revolving loan fund. The fund shall be used to provide financial assistance to state government agencies for the purposes of KRS

56.770

to

56.784

.

The fund may receive state appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds and shall include earnings from the investment of moneys in the fund. Any fund balance at the close of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall carry forward to the next fiscal year and shall remain available solely for the purposes of this section.

Administration of this fund shall be the responsibility of the cabinet. The cabinet shall establish terms and conditions for loans from the fund including the application and repayment process. The cabinet shall establish and implement fiscal controls and accounting periods for payments received and disbursements made by the fund and for fund balances at the beginning and end of each accounting period.

All repayments of loans made under this section shall be paid into the fund. Balances, or portions thereof, in the fund shall not revert to the general fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 35, § 4, effective July 15, 2002; 2008, ch. 139, § 9, effective July 15, 2008; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 5, § 9, effective February 25, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(2/25/2010). 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 5, sec. 28, provides that the repeal and reenactment of this section in that Act “shall apply retroactively to July 15, 2008.”

56.784.
Guaranteed energy savings performance contracts — Authority for administrative regulations.

Each agency responsible for managing state-owned property shall review the utility usage of the property and shall cooperate with the cabinet to determine which properties are good candidates for guaranteed energy savings performance contracts. The responsible agency is encouraged to implement guaranteed energy savings performance contracts where appropriate.

The cabinet may implement the provisions of KRS

56.770

to

56.784

through the promulgation of administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A.

The secretary of the cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A establishing a process for procurement of energy savings performance contracts, including required contract language. The following entities shall adhere to these regulations when procuring services under a guaranteed energy savings performance contract:

Any governing body of a postsecondary institution that manages its capital construction program under KRS

164A.580

; or

Any public corporation as defined by KRS 45.750(2)(c) or as created under the Kentucky Revised Statutes as a governmental agency and instrumentality of the Commonwealth that manages its capital construction program.

All state agencies, including those identified in subsection (3) of this section, shall submit proposed guaranteed energy savings performance contracts to the Office of Financial Management within the Office of the Controller for review and approval prior to contract execution.

The secretary shall report all authorized guaranteed energy savings performance contracts to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee for its review.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 223, § 8, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 35, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 85, § 80, effective June 20, 2005; 2007 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 32, effective August 30, 2007; 2008, ch. 139, § 10, effective July 15, 2008; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 5, § 10, effective February 25, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(2/25/2010). 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 5, sec. 28, provides that the repeal and reenactment of this section in that Act “shall apply retroactively to July 15, 2008.”